District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-307.01

Supply management rules.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 701, 32 DCR 7396
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1039(a), 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 5(b), 53 DCR 6794
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1187.1.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1039(a) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Short title of subtitle I of title I of Law 16-33: Section 1038 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle I of title I of the act may be cited as the Surplus Personal Property Sales Operating Fund Amendment Act of 2005.